District of Columbia statutes.
Reserved

19-1305.04

Discretionary trusts; effect of standard

History

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 504 of the Uniform Trust Code.